en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Cardio: Cardio Machine Accessories & Parts; Cardio Machines; Fitness Trampolines & Rebounders; Jump Ropes
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > คาร์ดิโอ: อุปกรณ์เสริมและอะไหล่เครื่องคาร์ดิโอ; เครื่องคาดิโอ; แทรมโพลีนฟิตเนสและรีบาวน์เดอร์; เชื่อกสำหรับกระโดด
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Kardio: Trenažery – příslušenství a díly; Trenažéry; Fitness trampolíny; Švihadla
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 心肺運動: 心肺訓練器材配件/零件; 心肺訓練器材; 健身彈跳床; 跳繩
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Кардио тренировки: Аксесоари и части за машини за кардио; Уреди за кардио тренировки; Фитнес батути и трамплини; Въжета за скачане
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Trening kardio: Akcesoria i części do urządzeń cardio; Sprzęt kardio; Trampoliny fitness; Skakanki
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Cardio: Accesorios y piezas para máquinas cardiovasculares; Máquinas de cardio; Trampolines y rebotadores de fitness; Cuerdas de salto
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Cardio: Accessori e ricambi per macchine cardio; Cardio machine; Trampolini e rebounder fitness; Corde per saltare
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Kardió: Kardiógép-kiegészítők és -alkatrészek; Kardiógépek; Fitnesz trambulinok és rebounderek; Ugrókötelek
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Konditionsträning: Tillbehör och delar till konditionsträningsmaskiner; Maskiner för kardioträning; Fitnesstrampoliner och rebounders; Hopprep
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Kardio: Pribor i dijelovi za kardio sprave; Kardio sprave; Trampolini i odbijajuće mreže za fitness; Užad za preskakanje
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardiofitness: Acessórios e peças para máquina de cardiofitness; Máquinas de cardiofitness; Trampolins de fitness; Cordas de saltar
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Cardio: Zubehör und Teile für Cardiogeräte; Cardiogeräte; Fitnesstrampoline & Rebounder; Springseile
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Bài tập dành cho tim: Phụ kiện và bộ phận máy tập tim mạch; Máy tập cardio; Bạt nhún lò xo tập thể dục; Dây nhảy
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Кардиотренировки: Аксессуары и детали для кардиотренажеров; Кардиотренажеры; Фитнес-батуты и ребаундеры; Скакалки
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Cardio: Tilbehør og dele til cardiomaskiner; Cardio-maskiner; Fitnesstrampoliner og reboundere; Sjippetov
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Kardio: Tilbehør og deler til kardiomaskiner; Kardiomaskiner; Treningstrampoliner og reboundere; Hoppetau
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 카디오: 카디오 머신 부대용품/부품; 심장 강화 운동 기구; 피트니스 트램펄린 및 리바운더; 줄넘기 줄
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Kardiyo: Kardiyo Makinesi Aksesuarları ve Parçaları; Kardiyo Makineleri; Fitness trambolinleri ve rebounder'lar; İp Atlama Halatları
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Cardio: Accessoires en onderdelen voor cardioapparaten; Cardioapparaten; Fitnesstrampolines en -rebounders; Springtouwen
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ασκήσεις καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης: Αξεσουάρ & ανταλλακτικά για μηχανήματα καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης; Μηχανήματα καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης; Τραμπολίνα γυμναστικής και ριμπάουντερ; Σχοινάκι άλματος
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Kardiotreniruotės: Kardiotreniruoklių priedai ir dalys; Kardiotreniruokliai; Fitneso batutai ir šokdynės; Šokdynės
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Cardio: Accessoires et pièces pour machines cardio; Machines de cardiotraining; Trampolines de fitness et rebondeurs; Cordes à sauter
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Kardio: Dodatki in deli za kardio naprave; Kardio naprave; Fitnes trampolini in odbijalci; Kolebnice
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 有氧运动: 有氧运动器械配件/零件; 有氧运动机; 健身蹦床与反弹跳床; 跳绳
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardio: Acessórios e peças para máquinas de cardio; Aparelhos para exercícios aeróbicos; Mini trampolins e camas elásticas fitness; Cordas de pular
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Kardio cvičenie: Príslušenstvo a diely kardio prístrojov; Stroje na kardio tréning; Fitness trampolíny a odrazové steny; Švihadlá
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Cardio: Accesorii și piese pentru aparate de fitness; Aparate pentru cardio; Trambuline și reboundere de fitness; Coarde pentru sărituri
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 有酸素運動: カーディオマシン関連用品・部品; フィットネスマシン; フィットネストランポリン・リバウンダー; なわとび
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Kestävyysurheilu: Kestävyysurheilulaitteiden lisätarvikkeet ja -osat; Kuntoilulaitteet kestävyysharjoitteluun; Kuntotrampoliinit; Hyppynarut